Mississippi, session 2026, HB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 85-7-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 85-7-107.  (1)  All motor vehicles repaired for any person, and at his or her instance, shall be liable for the price of the labor and material employed in constructing, manufacturing or repairing the same; and the mechanic to whom the price of * * * said the labor and material may be due shall have the right to retain possession of such motor vehicles so repaired until the price * * * be is paid. If such price * * * shall is not * * * be paid within thirty (30) days, and the person to whom such charges are payable and owing intends to commence suit as provided in this section, such person shall notify, by certified mail, the legal owner and the holder of any lien of the amount of charges due thereon and provide an opportunity for redemption. If such property has not been redeemed within five (5) days after the mailing of such certified letter, the person to whom such charges are payable and owing may commence suit in any court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proof of the value of the labor and materials employed in such repairs, manufacture or construction, and that such labor and materials furnished were reasonably necessary to prevent deterioration, permit operation and preserve the property, shall be entitled to judgment against the party for whom such labor was done or materials furnished, with costs, as in other cases, and to a special order for the sale of the property retained in his or her possession for the payment thereof, with costs, and to an execution, as in other cases, for the residue of what remains unpaid after sale of the property.    The proceeds of the sale of such property in excess of the amount needed to pay the judgment and necessary expenses of the procedure required by this section shall be held by the person for a period of six (6) months, and if not reclaimed by the owner thereof within that time shall become the property of the county and be paid over to the chancery clerk of the county in which the sale was held to be deposited into the county general fund, subject however to any rights of recorded lienholders. (2)  The mechanic to whom the price of the labor and material may be due shall have the right to seek title of the repaired motor vehicle from a title loan company after nonpayment of services, if the person whose vehicle was repaired acquired a title loan on the vehicle after the mechanic began repairing the vehicle. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.